incubator/apertium-fr-nl/apertium-fr-nl.nl.dix
    <pardef n="g/aan__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>aan<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aat</l>
          <r>aan<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aat</l>
          <r>aan<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aan</l>
          <r>aan<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aan</l>
          <r>aan<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aan</l>
          <r>aan<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>aan<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>aan<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>aan<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ingen</l>
          <r>aan<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ingen</l>
          <r>aan<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ingen</l>
          <r>aan<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="w/orden__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ord</l>
          <r>orden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ordt</l>
          <r>orden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ordt</l>
          <r>orden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orden</l>
          <r>orden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orden</l>
          <r>orden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orden</l>
          <r>orden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erd</l>
          <r>orden<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erd</l>
          <r>orden<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erd</l>
          <r>orden<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erden</l>
          <r>orden<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erden</l>
          <r>orden<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erden</l>
          <r>orden<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>




    <pardef n="to/nen__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ont</l>
          <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ont</l>
          <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nen</l>
          <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nen</l>
          <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nen</l>
          <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
  </pardef>



  <pardef n="to/nen__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ont</l>
          <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ont</l>
          <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nen</l>
          <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nen</l>
          <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nen</l>
          <r>nen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
  </pardef>



<pardef n="k/omen__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>omen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omt</l>
          <r>omen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omt</l>
          <r>omen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omen</l>
          <r>omen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omen</l>
          <r>omen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omen</l>
          <r>omen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wam</l>
          <r>omen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wam</l>
          <r>omen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wam</l>
          <r>omen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wamen</l>
          <r>omen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wamen</l>
          <r>omen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wamen</l>
          <r>omen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="gaan"><i>g</i><par n="g/aan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tonen"><i>to</i><par n="to/nen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="worden"><i>w</i><par n="w/orden__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="komen"><i>k</i><par n="k/omen__vblex"/></e>
